Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
338

VITAL
STATISTICS

Part I. State Public Health Statistics Act

Section

338-1 Definitions of terms

338-2 Authority and duties of the department of
health

338-3 Registration districts

338-4 Deaths reported to county clerks

338-4.5 Deaths reported to state agencies

338-5 Compulsory registration of births

338-6 Local agent to prepare birth certificate

338-7 Registration of foundlings; foundling
report

338-8 Compulsory registration of deaths and
fetal deaths

338-9 Filing and preparation of death and fetal
death

certificates

338-10 Late determination of the cause of death

338-11 Form of certificates

338-12 Evidentiary character of certificates

338-13 Certified copies

338-14 Fees for certified copies and searches;
transcripts

or other statistical summaries of vital
records for

National Center for Health Statistics;
certified

copies for veterans and others; and
corrections on

vital statistics certificates

338-14.3 Verification in lieu of a certified copy

338-14.5 Copies of certificate; fees

338-14.6 Vital statistics improvement special fund

338-15 Late or altered certificates

338-16 Procedure concerning late and altered
birth

certificates

338-17 Late or altered certificate as evidence

338-17.5 Judicial procedure to establish facts of
birth

338-17.7 Establishment of new certificates of
birth, when

338-17.8 Certificates for children born out of State

338-18 Disclosure of records

338-19 Photostatic or typewritten copies of
records

338-20 Adoption

338-20.5 Adoption; foreign born persons

338-21 Children born to parents not married to
each other

338-22 Other persons required to make records

338-23 Permit for removal, burial, or other
disposition

of body

338-24 Foreign permit for removal, burial, or
other

disposition of body

338-25 Prerequisite for permit

338-25.5 Disinterment of human bodies

338-25.6 Fee

338-26, 27 Repealed

338-28 Transmittal of certificates to department

338-29 Repealed

338-29.5 Late registration of death, fetal death,
marriage,

and divorce

338-30 Penalties

Part II. Certificates of Hawaiian Birth

338-41 Issuance; procedure

338-42 Repealed

338-43 Perjury

338-44 Renumbered

Part III. General Provisions

338-51 Administration of oaths

338-55 Disposition of body; armed forces service
members

Cross References

Reciprocal beneficiaries, see chapter 572C.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next